Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1551
Amercement; execution on original judgment; rights of officer.

In cases where a sheriff or other officer may be amerced, and shall not have collected the amount of the original judgment, he shall be permitted to sue out an execution, and collect the amount of said judgment in the name of the original plaintiff, for his own use.

R.S.1867, Code § 519, p. 483;

R.S.1913, § 8098;

C.S.1922, § 9034;

C.S.1929, § 20-1552;

R.S.1943, § 25-1551.